Massachusetts, session 194th, S2251.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 25A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 edition, is hereby amended
by adding the following section:-
Section 11F 2/3. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:
“Carbon intensity,” means the quantity of lifecycle greenhouse gas emissions associated
with a unit of specific transportation fuel, expressed in grams of carbon dioxide equivalent per
megajoule of transportation fuel,
“Clean fuel,” means a transportation fuel that has a carbon intensity level that is below
the clean fuels carbon intensity standard in a given year,
“Credit,” means a unit of measurement equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide
equivalent and that serves as a quantitative measure of the degree to which a fuel provider’s
of 4

transportation fuel volume is lower than the carbon intensity established by the clean fuel
standard,
"Credit generator" means a transportation fuel provider of a clean fuel for use in this
state, which, in the case of electricity used as a transportation fuel, could include, but is not
limited to, automakers, electric charging providers, electric utilities, and electric vehicle fleet
operators.
“Deficit,” means a quantitative measure of the degree to which a fuel provider’s volume
of transportation fuel is greater than the carbon intensity than permissible according to the annual
clean fuel standard,
“Full fuels lifecycle" means the aggregate of greenhouse gas emissions, including direct
emissions and significant indirect emissions, such as significant emissions from land use
changes, as determined by the Argonne Greenhouse gases, Regulated Emissions, and Energy use
in Technologies (GREET) model or a subsequent prevailing standard;
“Transportation fuel provider” means an entity that functions as an importer, blender,
refiner, producer or wholesale retailer of transportation fuels or as a retailer of a clean fuel,
(b)(1) The department of energy resources shall establish a clean fuel standard that
reduces the aggregate carbon intensity of transportation fuels by 80% from 1990 levels by 2050,
establishes a mechanism for the generation and trading of credits at a market-based rate to offset
carbon deficits, and supports clean energy and accessible transportation projects in
disadvantaged communities.
of 4

(b)(2) The clean fuel standard shall apply to transportation fuel providers with the
exception of providers of fuels for aviation, railroad locomotives, military vehicles, interstate
waterborne vessels, and fuels imported, blended, refined, or wholesaled in volumes below
thresholds established by the department. Sustainable aviation fuel and other clean fuels, as
determined by the department, shall be eligible to generate credits for the transportation fuel
provider of such fuels on an opt-in basis.
(b)(3) Aviation fuel providers are eligible to opt-in to the clean fuel standard to earn
credits for fueling aircraft with aviation fuel with associated lifecycle greenhouse gas emissions
lower than the per-unit carbon intensity established under the guidelines of the clean fuel
standard.
(b)(4) The department shall establish an annual schedule to phase-in implementation of
the clean fuel standard’s carbon intensity reduction that considers the cost of compliance, the
technologies available to fuel providers, and the need to maintain fuel quality and availability.
The aggregate carbon intensity of a transportation fuel shall be measured on a full fuels lifecycle
basis. The full fuels lifecycle shall be assessed annually.
(c)(1) The clean fuel standard shall establish a mechanism that assigns credits to
transportation fuel providers whose fuel or fuels’ carbon intensity is below the standards adopted
by the department and a market for the trading of credits at a market-based rate. Credits shall be
quantified based on the total emissions across the lifecycle of the provider’s fuel and the annual
maximum allowable carbon emission intensity for that year. These credits may be applied to
future obligations or be traded on a market mechanism, established by the department to satisfy
or offset compliance obligations of transportation fuel providers incurring a deficit.
of 4

(c)(2)Fuel providers subject to the clean fuel standard shall comply by importing,
blending, refining, or wholesaling transportation fuels with an average aggregate carbon intensity
that is at or below the standard as determined by the department or by purchasing credits to
offset any aggregate deficit incurred from transportation fuels exceeding the average carbon
intensity standard for that year.
(d) Public entities serving as credit generators, to include but not limited to utilities and
state agencies, shall invest or direct a percentage, to be determined by the department, of the
entity’s overall credit value to support clean energy and accessible transportation projects in
disadvantaged communities beyond existing local, federal, and state incentives. The department
shall determine projects and goals under this subdivision in consultation with credit generators,
communities, community leaders, and environmental justice advocates.
(e) The department shall promulgate rules, regulations, plans, proposals, procedures, and
administrative fees as are necessary and appropriate to effectuate a clean fuel standard and credit
marketplace to ensure compliance with this section and to offset the costs of implementation of
the clean fuel standard.
of 4